Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2618
Nonresident consultant; rights and privileges.

A nonresident applicant may qualify for a license under sections 44-2606 to 44-2635 as a nonresident consultant. A license issued to a nonresident shall grant the same rights and privileges offered a resident licensee, except that whenever, by the laws, rules, or regulations of any other state or jurisdiction, any limitation of rights and privileges, conditions precedent, or other requirements are imposed upon residents of Nebraska who are nonresident applicants or licensees of such other state or jurisdiction in addition to or in excess of those imposed on nonresidents under sections 44-2606 to 44-2635, the same requirements shall be imposed upon the residents of such other state or jurisdiction.

Laws 1980, LB 481, § 13;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 207.